Washington statutes.
RCW 39.84.200

Authority of community economic revitalization board under this chapter.

The community economic revitalization board under chapter 43.160 RCW shall have all the powers of a public corporation under this chapter. To the extent applicable, all duties of a public corporation apply to the community economic revitalization board in exercising its powers under this chapter.

[ 1984 c 257 s 11.]